Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4663.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1016. Notwithstanding section 609(1) and R 436.1041 of the Michigan Administrative Code, a licensee may donate a portion of the profits generated from the licensee's license to an organization that is not a licensee and that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501, if the licensee records its profits on its financial records before making the donation allowed under this section. On request, the licensee shall report its profits to the commission. Notwithstanding section 609(1), if the organization receiving the donation has been issued a special license, the organization must not use the donation to pay for any portion of the event for which the special license was issued.